Illinois, session 104th, SB133.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 53-5 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/3-5)7    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use, which, on and after January 1, 82025, includes use by a lessee, of the following tangible 9personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:10    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 11society, association, foundation, institution, or 12organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 13organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 14for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 15personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 16purpose of resale by the enterprise.17    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 18Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 19operating, or promoting the county fair.20    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 21or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 22by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 23under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that   SB0133- 2 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 2support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 3services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 4music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 5orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 6organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 7and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 8effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 9otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 10purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 11by the Department.12    (4) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, personal 13property purchased by a governmental body, by a corporation, 14society, association, foundation, or institution organized and 15operated exclusively for charitable, religious, or educational 16purposes, or by a not-for-profit corporation, society, 17association, foundation, institution, or organization that has 18no compensated officers or employees and that is organized and 19operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 years of 20age or older. A limited liability company may qualify for the 21exemption under this paragraph only if the limited liability 22company is organized and operated exclusively for educational 23purposes. On and after July 1, 1987, however, no entity 24otherwise eligible for this exemption shall make tax-free 25purchases unless it has an active exemption identification 26number issued by the Department.  SB0133- 3 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    (5) Until July 1, 2003, a passenger car that is a 2replacement vehicle to the extent that the purchase price of 3the car is subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.4    (6) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 52004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 6equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 7and used, and including that manufactured on special order, 8certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for graphic 9arts production, and including machinery and equipment 10purchased for lease. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 11acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 12acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change upon 13a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, graphic 14arts machinery and equipment is included in the manufacturing 15and assembling machinery and equipment exemption under 16paragraph (18). 17    (7) Farm chemicals.18    (8) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 19coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 20United States of America, or the government of any foreign 21country, and bullion.22    (9) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 23student organization affiliated with an elementary or 24secondary school located in Illinois.25    (10) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile renting, 26as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation and Use Tax   SB0133- 4 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1Act.2    (11) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 3including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 4purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 5State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 6replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 7machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 8implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 9Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 10chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 11to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 12Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 13registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 14polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 15overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 16equipment under this item (11). Agricultural chemical tender 17tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 18motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 19on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 20of the tender is separately stated.21    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 22farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 23installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 24limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 25or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 26limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors,   SB0133- 5 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 2such equipment.3    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 4sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 5computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 6facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 7to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 8crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 9agricultural chemicals. 10    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 11also includes electrical power generation equipment used 12primarily for production agriculture. 13    This item (11) is exempt from the provisions of Section 143-90.15    (12) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 16to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 17to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 18conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 19destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 20the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 21domestic stopovers.22    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 23to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 24used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 25its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 26engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the   SB0133- 6 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 2at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 3origination to the city of final destination on the same 4aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 5that aircraft. 6    (13) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 7stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 8food and beverages purchased at retail from a retailer, to the 9extent that the proceeds of the service charge are in fact 10turned over as tips or as a substitute for tips to the 11employees who participate directly in preparing, serving, 12hosting or cleaning up the food or beverage function with 13respect to which the service charge is imposed.14    (14) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 15and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 16rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 17pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 18(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 19lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 20exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 21machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 22motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 23Vehicle Code.24    (15) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 25repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 26that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser   SB0133- 7 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 2photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.3    (16) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 4mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 5reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 6equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 7excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 8Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 9Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 10for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 11(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 12during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 1316, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456). 14    (17) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 15equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed by the 16retailer, certified by the user to be used only for the 17production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for consumption 18as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel for the personal 19use of the user, and not subject to sale or resale.20    (18) Manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 21used primarily in the process of manufacturing or assembling 22tangible personal property for wholesale or retail sale or 23lease, whether that sale or lease is made directly by the 24manufacturer or by some other person, whether the materials 25used in the process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 26person, or whether that sale or lease is made apart from or as   SB0133- 8 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1an incident to the seller's engaging in the service occupation 2of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, patterns, gauges, or 3other similar items of no commercial value on special order 4for a particular purchaser. The exemption provided by this 5paragraph (18) includes production related tangible personal 6property, as defined in Section 3-50, purchased on or after 7July 1, 2019. The exemption provided by this paragraph (18) 8does not include machinery and equipment used in (i) the 9generation of electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) 10the generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 11wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 12through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment of 13water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 14customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The provisions 15of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of existing law as to the 16meaning and scope of this exemption. Beginning on July 1, 172017, the exemption provided by this paragraph (18) includes, 18but is not limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, 19as defined in paragraph (6) of this Section. 20    (19) Personal property delivered to a purchaser or 21purchaser's donee inside Illinois when the purchase order for 22that personal property was received by a florist located 23outside Illinois who has a florist located inside Illinois 24deliver the personal property.25    (20) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 26for direct agricultural production.  SB0133- 9 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    (21) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 2meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 3Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 4Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 5Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 6racing for prizes. This item (21) is exempt from the 7provisions of Section 3-90, and the exemption provided for 8under this item (21) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 91995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 10January 1, 2008 for such taxes paid during the period 11beginning May 30, 2000 and ending on January 1, 2008. 12    (22) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 13any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 14analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 15lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 16longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would 17otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 18hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 19identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 20the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 21in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 22in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 23the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 24the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 25at the time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 26collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated)   SB0133- 10 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 2this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the 3tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 4collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 5have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 6lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 7for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 8Department.9    (23) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 10the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 11in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 12the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 13been issued an active sales tax exemption identification 14number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 15Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 16does not qualify for this exemption or used in any other 17non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 18imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case 19may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 20time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 21attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 22purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 23Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 24has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 25collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 26have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the   SB0133- 11 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 2for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 3Department.4    (24) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 5December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 6before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 7for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 8disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 9manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 10corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 11that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 12number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 13who reside within the declared disaster area.14    (25) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 15December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 16before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 17the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 18including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 19access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 20water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 21purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 22facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 23State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 24Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 25in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 26disaster.  SB0133- 12 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    (26) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 2at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 3used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 4provisions of Section 3-90.5    (27) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 61-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 7corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 8foundation, or institution that is determined by the 9Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 10educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 11corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 12foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 13for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 14schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 15useful branches of learning by methods common to public 16schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 17intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 18schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 19organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 20study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 21individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 22technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 23occupation.24    (28) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 25including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 26benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school,   SB0133- 13 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 2the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 3district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 4parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 5does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 6private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 7entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 8another individual or entity that sold the property for the 9purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 10from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 11exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.12    (29) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 132001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 14serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 15other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 16Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 17and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 18amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 19paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 20commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 21paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.22    (30) Beginning January 1, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 23food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 24premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 25soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 26consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines,   SB0133- 14 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 2materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 3use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 4assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 5resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 6the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 7in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 8Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.9    (31) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 10Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 11utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 12diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 13purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 14of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 15lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 16Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 17identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 18the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 19in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 20in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 21the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 22the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 23at the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 24collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) 25that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 26this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the   SB0133- 15 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 2collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 3have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 4lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 5for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 6Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 7Section 3-90.8    (32) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 9Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 10who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 11executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 12subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 13that has been issued an active sales tax exemption 14identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 15the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased 16in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or used in 17any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the 18tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the 19case may be, based on the fair market value of the property at 20the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect 21or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 22purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 23Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 24has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 25collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 26have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the   SB0133- 16 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 2for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 3Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 4Section 3-90.5    (33) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 2004, 6the use in this State of motor vehicles of the second division 7with a gross vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds and that 8are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 9Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on 10July 1, 2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State 11of motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 12vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that are 13subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 14Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and (iii) that 15are primarily used for commercial purposes. Through June 30, 162005, this exemption applies to repair and replacement parts 17added after the initial purchase of such a motor vehicle if 18that motor vehicle is used in a manner that would qualify for 19the rolling stock exemption otherwise provided for in this 20Act. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "used for 21commercial purposes" means the transportation of persons or 22property in furtherance of any commercial or industrial 23enterprise, whether for-hire or not. 24    (34) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 25used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 26supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental   SB0133- 17 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 2corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 3under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 4paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.5    (35) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 6December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 7and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 8of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 9repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 10includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 11refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 12maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 13exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 14components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 15replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 16power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 17installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 18supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 19sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 20latex gloves, and protective films. 21    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 2231, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 23tangible personal property by persons who modify, refurbish, 24complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 25hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 26approved repair station by the Federal Aviation   SB0133- 18 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 2operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 3Regulations. From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, 4this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying tangible 5personal property by: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, 6complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 7hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 8approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 9Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 10operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 11Regulations; and (B) persons who engage in the modification, 12replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 13power plants without regard to whether or not those persons 14meet the qualifications of item (A). 15    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 16commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 17service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 18129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 19this paragraph (35) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 20existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 21exemption under this paragraph (35) applies continuously from 22January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 23for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 24the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 25and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 26101-629).  SB0133- 19 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    (36) Tangible personal property purchased by a 2public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 311-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 4constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 5only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 6transferred to the municipality without any further 7consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 8of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 9retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 10instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 11connection with the development of the municipal convention 12hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 13corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 14Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 15of Section 3-90. 16    (37) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 172026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 18    (38) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental Purchase 19Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser must certify 20that the item is purchased to be rented subject to a 21rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the Rental-Purchase 22Agreement Act, and provide proof of registration under the 23Rental Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax Act. This 24paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.25    (39) Tangible personal property purchased by a purchaser 26who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of   SB0133- 20 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 2Section 3-90.3    (40) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 4construction or operation of a data center that has been 5granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 6Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 7personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 8tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 9of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 10have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 111, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect may apply for and 12obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 13equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 14supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 15purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 16qualified. 17    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 18grant a certificate of exemption under this item (40) to 19qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 20Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 21Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 22    For the purposes of this item (40): 23        "Data center" means a building or a series of 24    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 25    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 26    the State of Illinois.   SB0133- 21 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 2    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 3    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 4    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 5    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 6    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 7    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 8    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 9    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 10    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 11    systems; other cabling; and other data center 12    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 13    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 14    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 15    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 16    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 17    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 18    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 19    personal property; and all other tangible personal 20    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 21    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 22    property" also includes building materials physically 23    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 24    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 25    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 26    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and   SB0133- 22 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    Economic Opportunity. 2    This item (40) is exempt from the provisions of Section 33-90. 4    (41) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 5collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 6item (41) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. As 7used in this item (41): 8        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 9    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 10    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 11    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 12    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 13    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 14    time of sale. 15        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 16    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 17    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 18    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 19    milk until it is ready for consumption. 20        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 21    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 22    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 23    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 24    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 25    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 26    milk storage bags.   SB0133- 23 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 2    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 3    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 4    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 5    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 6    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 7    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 8    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 9    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 10    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 11    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 12    or distributor. 13        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 14    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 15    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 16    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 17    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 18    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 19    manufacturer or distributor. 20    (42) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 21the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 22Property Act. This item (42) is exempt from the provisions of 23Section 3-90. 24    (43) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 25property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 26forces of the United States who presents valid military   SB0133- 24 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1identification and purchases the property using a form of 2payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 3of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 4prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 5transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 6paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 7the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 8years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 9States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 10Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 11Section 3-90. 12    (44) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 13to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 14intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 15Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 16Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This item 17(44) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 18    (45) (44) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 19in Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 20consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 21alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 22use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 23prepared for immediate consumption). This item (45) (44) is 24exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 25    (46) (44) Use by the lessee of the following leased 26tangible personal property:  SB0133- 25 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 2    meets the following requirements:3            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 4        by the licensor and the customer;5                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 6            customer accepts the license by means of an 7            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 8            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 9            the license will comply with this requirement;10                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 11            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 12            agree" does not comply with this requirement;13            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 14        use of the software;15            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 16        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 17        party (except to a related party) without the 18        permission and continued control of the licensor;19            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 20        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 21        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 22        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 23        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 24        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 25        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 26        the licensor; and  SB0133- 26 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 2        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 3        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 4        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 5        forth in the license agreement; and6        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 7    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 8    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 9    January 1, 2023. 10    (47) A motor vehicle of the first division, as defined in 11Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is registered 12in the State to an Illinois resident who acquired the vehicle 13while the Illinois resident was stationed outside of this 14State as an active duty member of the military. This item (47) 15is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 16    As used in this item (47): 17    "Active duty member of the military" means a service 18member who undertakes any full-time military training or 19full-time military duty, no matter how described under federal 20or State law, for which a service member is ordered to report 21by the President, by the Governor of a state, commonwealth, or 22territory of the United States, by an act of Congress, or by 23any other appropriate military authority. 24    "Illinois resident" means an individual who meets the 25definition of "resident" under subparagraph (A) of paragraph 26(20) of subsection (a) of Section 1501 of the Illinois Income   SB0133- 27 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1Tax Act. 2    "Service member" means a person who is a member of any 3component of the United States Armed Forces or the National 4Guard of any state, the District of Columbia, a commonwealth, 5or a territory of the United States. 6(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-700, Article 70, 7Section 70-5, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 75, Section 75-5, 8eff. 4-19-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, 9Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-5, 10eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 11103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 127-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; revised 1311-26-24.) 14    Section 10. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 15Section 3-5 as follows: 16    (35 ILCS 110/3-5)17    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use of the following tangible 18personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:19    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 20society, association, foundation, institution, or 21organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 22organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 23for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 24personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the   SB0133- 28 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1purpose of resale by the enterprise.2    (2) Personal property purchased by a non-profit Illinois 3county fair association for use in conducting, operating, or 4promoting the county fair.5    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 6or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 7by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 8under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 9is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 10support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 11services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 12music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 13orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 14organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 15and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 16effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 17otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 18purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 19by the Department.20    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 21coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 22United States of America, or the government of any foreign 23country, and bullion.24    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 252004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 26equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new   SB0133- 29 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 2purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 3primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 4chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 5chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 6immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 7July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 8in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 9exemption under Section 2 of this Act.10    (6) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 11student organization affiliated with an elementary or 12secondary school located in Illinois.13    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 14including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 15purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 16State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 17replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 18machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 19implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 20Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 21chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 22to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 23Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 24registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 25polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 26overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and   SB0133- 30 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 2tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 3motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 4on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 5of the tender is separately stated.6    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 7farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 8installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 9limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 10or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 11limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 12software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 13such equipment.14    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 15sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 16computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 17facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 18to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 19crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 20agricultural chemicals. 21    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 22also includes electrical power generation equipment used 23primarily for production agriculture. 24    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 253-75.26    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold   SB0133- 31 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 2to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 3conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 4destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 5the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 6domestic stopovers.7    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 8to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 9used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 10its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 11engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 12United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 13at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 14origination to the city of final destination on the same 15aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 16that aircraft. 17    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 18stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 19food and beverages acquired as an incident to the purchase of a 20service from a serviceman, to the extent that the proceeds of 21the service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 22substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 23in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 24beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 25imposed.26    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling,   SB0133- 32 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 2rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 3pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 4(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 5lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 6exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 7machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 8motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 9Vehicle Code.10    (11) Proceeds from the sale of photoprocessing machinery 11and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both 12new and used, including that manufactured on special order, 13certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for 14photoprocessing, and including photoprocessing machinery and 15equipment purchased for lease.16    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 17mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 18reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 19equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 20excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 21Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 22Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 23for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 24(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 25during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 2616, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).  SB0133- 33 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    (13) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 2for direct agricultural production.3    (14) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 4meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 5Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 6Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 7Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 8racing for prizes. This item (14) is exempt from the 9provisions of Section 3-75, and the exemption provided for 10under this item (14) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 111995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 12January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 13such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 14ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 1595-88).16    (15) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 17any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 18analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 19lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 20longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would 21otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 22hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 23identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 24the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 25in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 26in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for   SB0133- 34 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 2may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 3time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 4attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 5purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 6Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 7been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 8such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 9right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 10however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 11reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 12Department.13    (16) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 14the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 15in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 16the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 17been issued an active tax exemption identification number by 18the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' Occupation 19Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that does not 20qualify for this exemption or is used in any other non-exempt 21manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax imposed under 22this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, based on the 23fair market value of the property at the time the 24non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 25to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 26reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the   SB0133- 35 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 2by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 3from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 4refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 5amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 6is liable to pay that amount to the Department.7    (17) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 8December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 9before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 10for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 11disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 12manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 13corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 14that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 15number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 16who reside within the declared disaster area.17    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 18December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 19before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 20the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 21including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 22access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 23water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 24purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 25facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 26State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering   SB0133- 36 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 2in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 3disaster.4    (19) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 5at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 6used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 7provisions of Section 3-75.8    (20) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 91-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 10corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 11foundation, or institution that is determined by the 12Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 13educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 14corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 15foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 16for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 17schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 18useful branches of learning by methods common to public 19schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 20intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 21schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 22organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 23study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 24individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 25technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 26occupation.  SB0133- 37 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    (21) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 2including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 3benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 4a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 5the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 6district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 7parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 8does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 9private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 10entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 11another individual or entity that sold the property for the 12purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 13from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 14exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.15    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 162001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 17serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 18other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 19Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 20and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 21amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 22paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 23commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 24paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.25    (23) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 26food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the   SB0133- 38 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 2soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 3consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines, 4drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 5materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 6use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 7assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 8resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 9the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 10in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 11Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.12    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 13Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 14utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 15diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 16purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 17of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 18lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 19Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 20identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 21the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 22in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 23in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 24the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 25may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 26time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or   SB0133- 39 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 2purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 3Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 4been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 5such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 6right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 7however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 8reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 9Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 10Section 3-75.11    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 12Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 13who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 14executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 15subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 16that has been issued an active tax exemption identification 17number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 18Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 19does not qualify for this exemption or is used in any other 20nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 21imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, 22based on the fair market value of the property at the time the 23nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 24to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 25reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 26Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid   SB0133- 40 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 2from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 3refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 4amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 5is liable to pay that amount to the Department. This paragraph 6is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.7    (26) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 8used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 9supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 10Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 11corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 12under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 13paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 14    (27) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 15December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 16and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 17of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 18repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 19includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 20refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 21maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 22exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 23components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 24replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 25power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 26installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable   SB0133- 41 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 2sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 3latex gloves, and protective films. 4    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 531, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 6tangible personal property transferred incident to the 7modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 8or maintenance of aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 9Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 10repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 11have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 12accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 13From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption 14applies only to the use of qualifying tangible personal 15property transferred incident to: (A) the modification, 16refurbishment, completion, repair, replacement, or maintenance 17of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air Agency 18Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved repair 19station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a 20Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance 21with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) the 22modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft 23engines or power plants without regard to whether or not those 24persons meet the qualifications of item (A).25    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 26commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air   SB0133- 42 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 2129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 3this paragraph (27) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 4existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 5exemption under this paragraph (27) applies continuously from 6January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 7for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 8the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 9and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 10101-629).11    (28) Tangible personal property purchased by a 12public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 1311-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 14constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 15only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 16transferred to the municipality without any further 17consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 18of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 19retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 20instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 21connection with the development of the municipal convention 22hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 23corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 24Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 25of Section 3-75. 26    (29) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31,   SB0133- 43 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b12026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 2    (30) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 3who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of 4federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 5Section 3-75. 6    (31) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 7construction or operation of a data center that has been 8granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 9Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 10personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 11tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 12of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 13have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 141, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 15obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 16equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 17supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 18purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 19qualified. 20    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 21grant a certificate of exemption under this item (31) to 22qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 23Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 24Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 25    For the purposes of this item (31): 26        "Data center" means a building or a series of   SB0133- 44 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 2    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 3    the State of Illinois. 4        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 5    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 6    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 7    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 8    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 9    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 10    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 11    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 12    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 13    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 14    systems; other cabling; and other data center 15    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 16    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 17    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 18    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 19    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 20    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 21    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 22    personal property; and all other tangible personal 23    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 24    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 25    property" also includes building materials physically 26    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document   SB0133- 45 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 2    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 3    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 4    Economic Opportunity. 5    This item (31) is exempt from the provisions of Section 63-75. 7    (32) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 8collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 9item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. As 10used in this item (32): 11        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 12    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 13    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 14    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 15    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 16    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 17    time of sale. 18        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 19    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 20    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 21    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 22    milk until it is ready for consumption. 23        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 24    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 25    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 26    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and   SB0133- 46 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 2    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 3    milk storage bags. 4        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 5    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 6    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 7    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 8    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 9    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 10    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 11    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 12    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 13    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 14    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 15    or distributor. 16        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 17    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 18    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 19    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 20    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 21    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 22    manufacturer or distributor. 23    (33) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 24the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 25Property Act. This item (33) is exempt from the provisions of 26Section 3-75.   SB0133- 47 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    (34) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 2property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 3forces of the United States who presents valid military 4identification and purchases the property using a form of 5payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 6of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 7prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 8transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 9paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 10the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 11years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 12States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 13Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 14Section 3-75. 15    (35) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 16to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 17intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 18Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 19Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 20paragraph (35) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 21    (36) (35) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 22in Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 23transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 24or the Service Occupation Tax Act by an entity licensed under 25the Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 26Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community   SB0133- 48 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 2Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969, or 3by an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life 4Care Facilities Act. This item (36) (35) is exempt from the 5provisions of Section 3-75. 6    (37) (36) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 7in Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 8consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 9alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 10use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 11prepared for immediate consumption). This item (37) (36) is 12exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 13    (38) (35) Use by a lessee of the following leased tangible 14personal property:15        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 16    meets the following requirements:17            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 18        by the licensor and the customer;19                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 20            customer accepts the license by means of an 21            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 22            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 23            the license will comply with this requirement;24                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 25            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 26            agree" does not comply with this requirement;  SB0133- 49 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 2        use of the software;3            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 4        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 5        party (except to a related party) without the 6        permission and continued control of the licensor;7            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 8        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 9        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 10        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 11        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 12        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 13        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 14        the licensor; and15            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 16        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 17        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 18        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 19        forth in the license agreement; and20        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 21    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 22    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 23    January 1, 2023. 24    (39) A motor vehicle of the first division, as defined in 25Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is registered 26in the State to an Illinois resident who acquired the vehicle   SB0133- 50 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1while the Illinois resident was stationed outside of this 2State as an active duty member of the military. This item (39) 3is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 4    As used in this item (39): 5    "Active duty member of the military" means a service 6member who undertakes any full-time military training or 7full-time military duty, no matter how described under federal 8or State law, for which a service member is ordered to report 9by the President, by the Governor of a state, commonwealth, or 10territory of the United States, by an act of Congress, or by 11any other appropriate military authority. 12    "Illinois resident" means an individual who meets the 13definition of "resident" under subparagraph (A) of paragraph 14(20) of subsection (a) of Section 1501 of the Illinois Income 15Tax Act. 16    "Service member" means a person who is a member of any 17component of the United States Armed Forces or the National 18Guard of any state, the District of Columbia, a commonwealth, 19or a territory of the United States. 20(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-700, Article 70, 21Section 70-10, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 75, Section 2275-10, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, 23Section 5-10, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-10, 24eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 25103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 267-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995,   SB0133- 51 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 15. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 3changing Section 3-5 as follows: 4    (35 ILCS 115/3-5)5    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. The following tangible personal 6property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:7    (1) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 8association, foundation, institution, or organization, other 9than a limited liability company, that is organized and 10operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for the 11benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the personal 12property was not purchased by the enterprise for the purpose 13of resale by the enterprise.14    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 15Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 16operating, or promoting the county fair.17    (3) Personal property purchased by any not-for-profit arts 18or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 19by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 20under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 21is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 22support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 23services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 24music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony   SB0133- 52 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 2organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 3and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 4effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 5otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 6purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 7by the Department.8    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 9coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 10United States of America, or the government of any foreign 11country, and bullion.12    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 132004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 14equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 15and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 16purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 17primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 18chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 19chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 20immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 21July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 22in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 23exemption under Section 2 of this Act.24    (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored student 25organization affiliated with an elementary or secondary school 26located in Illinois.  SB0133- 53 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 2including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 3purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 4State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 5replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 6machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 7implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 8Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 9chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 10to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 11Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 12registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 13polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 14overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 15equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 16tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 17motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 18on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 19of the tender is separately stated.20    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 21farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 22installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 23limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 24or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 25limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 26software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other   SB0133- 54 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1such equipment.2    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 3sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 4computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 5facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 6to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 7crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 8agricultural chemicals. 9    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 10also includes electrical power generation equipment used 11primarily for production agriculture. 12    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 133-55.14    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 15to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 16to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 17conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 18destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 19the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 20domestic stopovers.21    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 22to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 23used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 24its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 25engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 26United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports   SB0133- 55 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 2origination to the city of final destination on the same 3aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 4that aircraft. 5    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 6stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 7food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 8service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 9substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 10in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 11beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 12imposed.13    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 14and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 15rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 16pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 17(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 18lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 19exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 20machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 21motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 22Vehicle Code.23    (11) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 24repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 25that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser 26to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including   SB0133- 56 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.2    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 3mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 4reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 5equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 6excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 7Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 8Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 9for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 10(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 11during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 1216, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).13    (13) Beginning January 1, 1992 and through June 30, 2016, 14food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 15premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 16soft drinks and food that has been prepared for immediate 17consumption) and prescription and non-prescription medicines, 18drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 19materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 20use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 21assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 22resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 23the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 24in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 25Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.26    (14) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock   SB0133- 57 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1for direct agricultural production.2    (15) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 3meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 4Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 5Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 6Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 7racing for prizes. This item (15) is exempt from the 8provisions of Section 3-55, and the exemption provided for 9under this item (15) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 101995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 11January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 12such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 13ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 1495-88).15    (16) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 16any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 17analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor 18who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 19executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 20hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 21identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 22the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act.23    (17) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 24property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or in 25effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental body that 26has been issued an active tax exemption identification number   SB0133- 58 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 2Occupation Tax Act.3    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 4December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 5before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 6for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 7disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 8manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 9corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 10that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 11number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 12who reside within the declared disaster area.13    (19) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 14December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 15before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 16the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 17including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 18access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 19water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 20purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 21facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 22State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 23Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 24in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 25disaster.26    (20) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold at a   SB0133- 59 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1"game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is used 2in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 3provisions of Section 3-55.4    (21) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 51-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 6corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 7foundation, or institution that is determined by the 8Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 9educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 10corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 11foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 12for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 13schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 14useful branches of learning by methods common to public 15schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 16intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 17schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 18organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 19study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 20individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 21technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 22occupation.23    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 24including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 25benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 26a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if   SB0133- 60 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 2district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 3parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 4does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 5private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 6entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 7another individual or entity that sold the property for the 8purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 9from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 10exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.11    (23) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 122001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 13serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 14other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 15Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 16and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 17amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 18paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 19commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 20paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.21    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 22Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 23utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 24diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to 25a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 26longer executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a   SB0133- 61 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 2identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 3the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 4from the provisions of Section 3-55.5    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 6Public Act 92-227), personal property sold to a lessor who 7leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 8executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 9governmental body that has been issued an active tax exemption 10identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 11the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 12from the provisions of Section 3-55.13    (26) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 142016, tangible personal property purchased from an Illinois 15retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized purchasing 16activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of the property 17in Illinois, temporarily store the property in Illinois (i) 18for the purpose of subsequently transporting it outside this 19State for use or consumption thereafter solely outside this 20State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, 21or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated into other 22tangible personal property to be transported outside this 23State and thereafter used or consumed solely outside this 24State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules 25adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 26Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing   SB0133- 62 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under 2this paragraph (26). The permit issued under this paragraph 3(26) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 4manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 5purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 6from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain 7all necessary books and records to substantiate the use and 8consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 9the State of Illinois.10    (27) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 11used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 12supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 13Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 14corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 15under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 16paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 17    (28) Tangible personal property sold to a 18public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 1911-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 20constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 21only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 22transferred to the municipality without any further 23consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 24of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 25retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 26instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in   SB0133- 63 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1connection with the development of the municipal convention 2hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 3corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 4Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 5of Section 3-55. 6    (29) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 7December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 8and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 9of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 10repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 11includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 12refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 13maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 14exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 15components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 16replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 17power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 18installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 19supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 20sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 21latex gloves, and protective films. 22    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 2331, 2023, this exemption applies only to the transfer of 24qualifying tangible personal property incident to the 25modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 26or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air   SB0133- 64 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 2repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 3have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 4accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 5The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 6commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 7service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 8129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 1, 2024 9through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies only to the 10transfer of qualifying tangible personal property incident to: 11(A) the modification, refurbishment, completion, repair, 12replacement, or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) 13hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 14approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 15Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 16operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 17Regulations; and (B) the modification, replacement, repair, 18and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants without 19regard to whether or not those persons meet the qualifications 20of item (A).21    The changes made to this paragraph (29) by Public Act 2298-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent of the 23General Assembly that the exemption under this paragraph (29) 24applies continuously from January 1, 2010 through December 31, 252024; however, no claim for credit or refund is allowed for 26taxes paid as a result of the disallowance of this exemption on   SB0133- 65 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1or after January 1, 2015 and prior to February 5, 2020 (the 2effective date of Public Act 101-629).3    (30) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 42026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 5    (31) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 6who is exempt from tax by operation of federal law. This 7paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 8    (32) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 9construction or operation of a data center that has been 10granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 11Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 12personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 13tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 14of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 15have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 161, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 17obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 18equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 19supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 20purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 21qualified. 22    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 23grant a certificate of exemption under this item (32) to 24qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 25Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 26Civil Administrative Code of Illinois.   SB0133- 66 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    For the purposes of this item (32): 2        "Data center" means a building or a series of 3    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 4    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 5    the State of Illinois. 6        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 7    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 8    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 9    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 10    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 11    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 12    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 13    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 14    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 15    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 16    systems; other cabling; and other data center 17    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 18    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 19    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 20    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 21    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 22    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 23    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 24    personal property; and all other tangible personal 25    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 26    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal   SB0133- 67 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    property" also includes building materials physically 2    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 3    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 4    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 5    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 6    Economic Opportunity. 7    This item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 83-55. 9    (33) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 10collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 11item (33) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. As 12used in this item (33): 13        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 14    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 15    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 16    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 17    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 18    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 19    time of sale. 20        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 21    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 22    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 23    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 24    milk until it is ready for consumption. 25        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 26    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast   SB0133- 68 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 2    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 3    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 4    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 5    milk storage bags. 6        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 7    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 8    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 9    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 10    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 11    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 12    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 13    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 14    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 15    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 16    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 17    or distributor. 18        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 19    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 20    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 21    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 22    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 23    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 24    manufacturer or distributor. 25    (34) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 26the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed   SB0133- 69 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1Property Act. This item (34) is exempt from the provisions of 2Section 3-55.3    (35) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 4property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 5forces of the United States who presents valid military 6identification and purchases the property using a form of 7payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 8of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 9prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 10transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 11paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 12the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 13years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 14States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 15Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 16Section 3-55. 17    (36) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 18to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 19intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 20Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 21Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 22paragraph (36) (35) is exempt from the provisions of Section 233-55. 24    (37) (36) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 25in Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 26transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act   SB0133- 70 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1or the Service Use Tax Act by an entity licensed under the 2Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 3Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 4Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 5Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969 or by 6an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life Care 7Facilities Act. This item (37) (36) is exempt from the 8provisions of Section 3-55. 9    (38) (37) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 10in Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 11consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 12alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 13use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 14prepared for immediate consumption). This item (38) (37) is 15exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 16    (39) (36) The lease of the following tangible personal 17property:18        (1) computer software transferred subject to a license 19    that meets the following requirements:20            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 21        by the licensor and the customer;22                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 23            customer accepts the license by means of an 24            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 25            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 26            the license will comply with this requirement;  SB0133- 71 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 2            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 3            agree" does not comply with this requirement;4            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 5        use of the software;6            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 7        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 8        party (except to a related party) without the 9        permission and continued control of the licensor;10            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 11        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 12        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 13        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 14        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 15        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 16        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 17        the licensor; and18            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 19        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 20        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 21        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 22        forth in the license agreement; and23        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 24    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 25    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 26    January 1, 2023.   SB0133- 72 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    (40) A motor vehicle of the first division, as defined in 2Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is registered 3in the State to an Illinois resident who acquired the vehicle 4while the Illinois resident was stationed outside of this 5State as an active duty member of the military. This item (40) 6is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 7    As used in this item (40): 8    "Active duty member of the military" means a service 9member who undertakes any full-time military training or 10full-time military duty, no matter how described under federal 11or State law, for which a service member is ordered to report 12by the President, by the Governor of a state, commonwealth, or 13territory of the United States, by an act of Congress, or by 14any other appropriate military authority. 15    "Illinois resident" means an individual who meets the 16definition of "resident" under subparagraph (A) of paragraph 17(20) of subsection (a) of Section 1501 of the Illinois Income 18Tax Act. 19    "Service member" means a person who is a member of any 20component of the United States Armed Forces or the National 21Guard of any state, the District of Columbia, a commonwealth, 22or a territory of the United States. 23(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-700, Article 70, 24Section 70-15, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 75, Section 2575-15, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, 26Section 5-15, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-15,   SB0133- 73 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 2103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 37-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, 4eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 5    Section 20. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 6by changing Section 2-5 as follows: 7    (35 ILCS 120/2-5)8    Sec. 2-5. Exemptions. Gross receipts from proceeds from 9the sale, which, on and after January 1, 2025, includes the 10lease, of the following tangible personal property are exempt 11from the tax imposed by this Act:12        (1) Farm chemicals.13        (2) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 14    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 15    the purchaser to be used primarily for production 16    agriculture or State or federal agricultural programs, 17    including individual replacement parts for the machinery 18    and equipment, including machinery and equipment purchased 19    for lease, and including implements of husbandry defined 20    in Section 1-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, farm 21    machinery and agricultural chemical and fertilizer 22    spreaders, and nurse wagons required to be registered 23    under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, but 24    excluding other motor vehicles required to be registered   SB0133- 74 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural polyhouses 2    or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 3    overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery 4    and equipment under this item (2). Agricultural chemical 5    tender tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold 6    separately from a motor vehicle required to be licensed 7    and units sold mounted on a motor vehicle required to be 8    licensed, if the selling price of the tender is separately 9    stated.10        Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 11    farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 12    installed on farm machinery and equipment including, but 13    not limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, 14    seeders, or spreaders. Precision farming equipment 15    includes, but is not limited to, soil testing sensors, 16    computers, monitors, software, global positioning and 17    mapping systems, and other such equipment.18        Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 19    sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in 20    the computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 21    facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not 22    limited to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of 23    animal and crop data for the purpose of formulating animal 24    diets and agricultural chemicals. 25        Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and 26    equipment also includes electrical power generation   SB0133- 75 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    equipment used primarily for production agriculture. 2        This item (2) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3    2-70.4        (3) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 5    equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed 6    by the retailer, certified by the user to be used only for 7    the production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for 8    consumption as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel 9    for the personal use of the user, and not subject to sale 10    or resale.11        (4) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again September 12    1, 2004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery 13    and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, 14    both new and used, and including that manufactured on 15    special order or purchased for lease, certified by the 16    purchaser to be used primarily for graphic arts 17    production. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 18    acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 19    acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change 20    upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, 21    graphic arts machinery and equipment is included in the 22    manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 23    exemption under paragraph (14).24        (5) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile 25    renting, as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation 26    and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from the   SB0133- 76 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    provisions of Section 2-70.2        (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored 3    student organization affiliated with an elementary or 4    secondary school located in Illinois.5        (7) Until July 1, 2003, proceeds of that portion of 6    the selling price of a passenger car the sale of which is 7    subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.8        (8) Personal property sold to an Illinois county fair 9    association for use in conducting, operating, or promoting 10    the county fair.11        (9) Personal property sold to a not-for-profit arts or 12    cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 13    by the Department by rule, that it has received an 14    exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 15    Code and that is organized and operated primarily for the 16    presentation or support of arts or cultural programming, 17    activities, or services. These organizations include, but 18    are not limited to, music and dramatic arts organizations 19    such as symphony orchestras and theatrical groups, arts 20    and cultural service organizations, local arts councils, 21    visual arts organizations, and media arts organizations. 22    On and after July 1, 2001 (the effective date of Public Act 23    92-35), however, an entity otherwise eligible for this 24    exemption shall not make tax-free purchases unless it has 25    an active identification number issued by the Department.26        (10) Personal property sold by a corporation, society,   SB0133- 77 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    association, foundation, institution, or organization, 2    other than a limited liability company, that is organized 3    and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for 4    the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 5    personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for 6    the purpose of resale by the enterprise.7        (11) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 8    personal property sold to a governmental body, to a 9    corporation, society, association, foundation, or 10    institution organized and operated exclusively for 11    charitable, religious, or educational purposes, or to a 12    not-for-profit corporation, society, association, 13    foundation, institution, or organization that has no 14    compensated officers or employees and that is organized 15    and operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 16    years of age or older. A limited liability company may 17    qualify for the exemption under this paragraph only if the 18    limited liability company is organized and operated 19    exclusively for educational purposes. On and after July 1, 20    1987, however, no entity otherwise eligible for this 21    exemption shall make tax-free purchases unless it has an 22    active identification number issued by the Department.23        (12) (Blank).24        (12-5) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 25    2004, motor vehicles of the second division with a gross 26    vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds that are subject   SB0133- 78 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    to the commercial distribution fee imposed under Section 2    3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on July 1, 3    2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State of 4    motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 5    vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that 6    are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed 7    under Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and 8    (iii) that are primarily used for commercial purposes. 9    Through June 30, 2005, this exemption applies to repair 10    and replacement parts added after the initial purchase of 11    such a motor vehicle if that motor vehicle is used in a 12    manner that would qualify for the rolling stock exemption 13    otherwise provided for in this Act. For purposes of this 14    paragraph, "used for commercial purposes" means the 15    transportation of persons or property in furtherance of 16    any commercial or industrial enterprise whether for-hire 17    or not. 18        (13) Proceeds from sales to owners or lessors, 19    lessees, or shippers of tangible personal property that is 20    utilized by interstate carriers for hire for use as 21    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce and equipment 22    operated by a telecommunications provider, licensed as a 23    common carrier by the Federal Communications Commission, 24    which is permanently installed in or affixed to aircraft 25    moving in interstate commerce.26        (14) Machinery and equipment that will be used by the   SB0133- 79 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    purchaser, or a lessee of the purchaser, primarily in the 2    process of manufacturing or assembling tangible personal 3    property for wholesale or retail sale or lease, whether 4    the sale or lease is made directly by the manufacturer or 5    by some other person, whether the materials used in the 6    process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 7    person, or whether the sale or lease is made apart from or 8    as an incident to the seller's engaging in the service 9    occupation of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, 10    patterns, gauges, or other similar items of no commercial 11    value on special order for a particular purchaser. The 12    exemption provided by this paragraph (14) does not include 13    machinery and equipment used in (i) the generation of 14    electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) the 15    generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 16    wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 17    through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment 18    of water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 19    customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The 20    provisions of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of 21    existing law as to the meaning and scope of this 22    exemption. Beginning on July 1, 2017, the exemption 23    provided by this paragraph (14) includes, but is not 24    limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, as 25    defined in paragraph (4) of this Section.26        (15) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately   SB0133- 80 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    stated on customers' bills for purchase and consumption of 2    food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 3    service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 4    substitute for tips to the employees who participate 5    directly in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the 6    food or beverage function with respect to which the 7    service charge is imposed. 8        (16) Tangible personal property sold to a purchaser if 9    the purchaser is exempt from use tax by operation of 10    federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 11    of Section 2-70. 12        (17) Tangible personal property sold to a common 13    carrier by rail or motor that receives the physical 14    possession of the property in Illinois and that transports 15    the property, or shares with another common carrier in the 16    transportation of the property, out of Illinois on a 17    standard uniform bill of lading showing the seller of the 18    property as the shipper or consignor of the property to a 19    destination outside Illinois, for use outside Illinois.20        (18) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or 21    silver coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the 22    government of the United States of America, or the 23    government of any foreign country, and bullion.24        (19) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, 25    drilling, and production equipment, including (i) rigs and 26    parts of rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover   SB0133- 81 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    rigs, (ii) pipe and tubular goods, including casing and 2    drill strings, (iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) 3    storage tanks and flow lines, (v) any individual 4    replacement part for oil field exploration, drilling, and 5    production equipment, and (vi) machinery and equipment 6    purchased for lease; but excluding motor vehicles required 7    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code.8        (20) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, 9    including repair and replacement parts, both new and used, 10    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 11    the purchaser to be used primarily for photoprocessing, 12    and including photoprocessing machinery and equipment 13    purchased for lease.14        (21) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate 15    exploration, mining, off-highway hauling, processing, 16    maintenance, and reclamation equipment, including 17    replacement parts and equipment, and including equipment 18    purchased for lease, but excluding motor vehicles required 19    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 20    changes made to this Section by Public Act 97-767 apply on 21    and after July 1, 2003, but no claim for credit or refund 22    is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 (the effective date 23    of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid during the 24    period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 16, 25    2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).26        (22) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products   SB0133- 82 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 2    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 3    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 4    flight destined for or returning from a location or 5    locations outside the United States without regard to 6    previous or subsequent domestic stopovers.7        Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 8    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 9    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 10    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 11    flight that (i) is engaged in foreign trade or is engaged 12    in trade between the United States and any of its 13    possessions and (ii) transports at least one individual or 14    package for hire from the city of origination to the city 15    of final destination on the same aircraft, without regard 16    to a change in the flight number of that aircraft. 17        (23) A transaction in which the purchase order is 18    received by a florist who is located outside Illinois, but 19    who has a florist located in Illinois deliver the property 20    to the purchaser or the purchaser's donee in Illinois.21        (24) Fuel consumed or used in the operation of ships, 22    barges, or vessels that are used primarily in or for the 23    transportation of property or the conveyance of persons 24    for hire on rivers bordering on this State if the fuel is 25    delivered by the seller to the purchaser's barge, ship, or 26    vessel while it is afloat upon that bordering river.  SB0133- 83 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1        (25) Except as provided in item (25-5) of this 2    Section, a motor vehicle sold in this State to a 3    nonresident even though the motor vehicle is delivered to 4    the nonresident in this State, if the motor vehicle is not 5    to be titled in this State, and if a drive-away permit is 6    issued to the motor vehicle as provided in Section 3-603 7    of the Illinois Vehicle Code or if the nonresident 8    purchaser has vehicle registration plates to transfer to 9    the motor vehicle upon returning to his or her home state. 10    The issuance of the drive-away permit or having the 11    out-of-state registration plates to be transferred is 12    prima facie evidence that the motor vehicle will not be 13    titled in this State.14        (25-5) The exemption under item (25) does not apply if 15    the state in which the motor vehicle will be titled does 16    not allow a reciprocal exemption for a motor vehicle sold 17    and delivered in that state to an Illinois resident but 18    titled in Illinois. The tax collected under this Act on 19    the sale of a motor vehicle in this State to a resident of 20    another state that does not allow a reciprocal exemption 21    shall be imposed at a rate equal to the state's rate of tax 22    on taxable property in the state in which the purchaser is 23    a resident, except that the tax shall not exceed the tax 24    that would otherwise be imposed under this Act. At the 25    time of the sale, the purchaser shall execute a statement, 26    signed under penalty of perjury, of his or her intent to   SB0133- 84 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    title the vehicle in the state in which the purchaser is a 2    resident within 30 days after the sale and of the fact of 3    the payment to the State of Illinois of tax in an amount 4    equivalent to the state's rate of tax on taxable property 5    in his or her state of residence and shall submit the 6    statement to the appropriate tax collection agency in his 7    or her state of residence. In addition, the retailer must 8    retain a signed copy of the statement in his or her 9    records. Nothing in this item shall be construed to 10    require the removal of the vehicle from this state 11    following the filing of an intent to title the vehicle in 12    the purchaser's state of residence if the purchaser titles 13    the vehicle in his or her state of residence within 30 days 14    after the date of sale. The tax collected under this Act in 15    accordance with this item (25-5) shall be proportionately 16    distributed as if the tax were collected at the 6.25% 17    general rate imposed under this Act. 18        (25-7) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed 19    under this Act on the sale of an aircraft, as defined in 20    Section 3 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, if all of the 21    following conditions are met:22            (1) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 23        after the later of either the issuance of the final 24        billing for the sale of the aircraft, or the 25        authorized approval for return to service, completion 26        of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the   SB0133- 85 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1        test flight and ground test for inspection, as 2        required by 14 CFR 91.407;3            (2) the aircraft is not based or registered in 4        this State after the sale of the aircraft; and5            (3) the seller retains in his or her books and 6        records and provides to the Department a signed and 7        dated certification from the purchaser, on a form 8        prescribed by the Department, certifying that the 9        requirements of this item (25-7) are met. The 10        certificate must also include the name and address of 11        the purchaser, the address of the location where the 12        aircraft is to be titled or registered, the address of 13        the primary physical location of the aircraft, and 14        other information that the Department may reasonably 15        require.16        For purposes of this item (25-7):17        "Based in this State" means hangared, stored, or 18    otherwise used, excluding post-sale customizations as 19    defined in this Section, for 10 or more days in each 20    12-month period immediately following the date of the sale 21    of the aircraft.22        "Registered in this State" means an aircraft 23    registered with the Department of Transportation, 24    Aeronautics Division, or titled or registered with the 25    Federal Aviation Administration to an address located in 26    this State.  SB0133- 86 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1        This paragraph (25-7) is exempt from the provisions of 2    Section 2-70. 3        (26) Semen used for artificial insemination of 4    livestock for direct agricultural production.5        (27) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with 6    and meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse 7    Club Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American 8    Quarter Horse Association, United States Trotting 9    Association, or Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for 10    purposes of breeding or racing for prizes. This item (27) 11    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70, and the 12    exemption provided for under this item (27) applies for 13    all periods beginning May 30, 1995, but no claim for 14    credit or refund is allowed on or after January 1, 2008 15    (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for such taxes 16    paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and ending 17    on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 18    95-88).19        (28) Computers and communications equipment utilized 20    for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 21    diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 22    sold to a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of 23    one year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 24    purchase, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax 25    exemption identification number by the Department under 26    Section 1g of this Act.  SB0133- 87 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1        (29) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 2    property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 3    in effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental 4    body that has been issued an active tax exemption 5    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 6    of this Act.7        (30) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 8    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 9    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 10    donated for disaster relief to be used in a State or 11    federally declared disaster area in Illinois or bordering 12    Illinois by a manufacturer or retailer that is registered 13    in this State to a corporation, society, association, 14    foundation, or institution that has been issued a sales 15    tax exemption identification number by the Department that 16    assists victims of the disaster who reside within the 17    declared disaster area.18        (31) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 19    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 20    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 21    used in the performance of infrastructure repairs in this 22    State, including, but not limited to, municipal roads and 23    streets, access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal 24    systems, water and sewer line extensions, water 25    distribution and purification facilities, storm water 26    drainage and retention facilities, and sewage treatment   SB0133- 88 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    facilities, resulting from a State or federally declared 2    disaster in Illinois or bordering Illinois when such 3    repairs are initiated on facilities located in the 4    declared disaster area within 6 months after the disaster.5        (32) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold 6    at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that 7    term is used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is 8    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.9        (33) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in 10    Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is 11    donated to a corporation, limited liability company, 12    society, association, foundation, or institution that is 13    determined by the Department to be organized and operated 14    exclusively for educational purposes. For purposes of this 15    exemption, "a corporation, limited liability company, 16    society, association, foundation, or institution organized 17    and operated exclusively for educational purposes" means 18    all tax-supported public schools, private schools that 19    offer systematic instruction in useful branches of 20    learning by methods common to public schools and that 21    compare favorably in their scope and intensity with the 22    course of study presented in tax-supported schools, and 23    vocational or technical schools or institutes organized 24    and operated exclusively to provide a course of study of 25    not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 26    individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual,   SB0133- 89 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 2    occupation.3        (34) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 4    including food, purchased through fundraising events for 5    the benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary 6    school, a group of those schools, or one or more school 7    districts if the events are sponsored by an entity 8    recognized by the school district that consists primarily 9    of volunteers and includes parents and teachers of the 10    school children. This paragraph does not apply to 11    fundraising events (i) for the benefit of private home 12    instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising entity 13    purchases the personal property sold at the events from 14    another individual or entity that sold the property for 15    the purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that 16    profits from the sale to the fundraising entity. This 17    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.18        (35) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 19    31, 2001, new or used automatic vending machines that 20    prepare and serve hot food and beverages, including 21    coffee, soup, and other items, and replacement parts for 22    these machines. Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 23    30, 2003, machines and parts for machines used in 24    commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending business 25    if a use or occupation tax is paid on the gross receipts 26    derived from the use of the commercial, coin-operated   SB0133- 90 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    amusement and vending machines. This paragraph is exempt 2    from the provisions of Section 2-70.3        (35-5) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 4    2016, food for human consumption that is to be consumed 5    off the premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic 6    beverages, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared 7    for immediate consumption) and prescription and 8    nonprescription medicines, drugs, medical appliances, and 9    insulin, urine testing materials, syringes, and needles 10    used by diabetics, for human use, when purchased for use 11    by a person receiving medical assistance under Article V 12    of the Illinois Public Aid Code who resides in a licensed 13    long-term care facility, as defined in the Nursing Home 14    Care Act, or a licensed facility as defined in the ID/DD 15    Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Specialized 16    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.17        (36) Beginning August 2, 2001, computers and 18    communications equipment utilized for any hospital purpose 19    and equipment used in the diagnosis, analysis, or 20    treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor who leases 21    the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 22    executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 23    hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 24    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 25    of this Act. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 26    of Section 2-70.  SB0133- 91 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1        (37) Beginning August 2, 2001, personal property sold 2    to a lessor who leases the property, under a lease of one 3    year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 4    purchase, to a governmental body that has been issued an 5    active tax exemption identification number by the 6    Department under Section 1g of this Act. This paragraph is 7    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.8        (38) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 9    2016, tangible personal property purchased from an 10    Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 11    purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt 12    of the property in Illinois, temporarily store the 13    property in Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently 14    transporting it outside this State for use or consumption 15    thereafter solely outside this State or (ii) for the 16    purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured 17    into, attached to, or incorporated into other tangible 18    personal property to be transported outside this State and 19    thereafter used or consumed solely outside this State. The 20    Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules adopted in 21    accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 22    issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing with the 23    Department who is eligible for the exemption under this 24    paragraph (38). The permit issued under this paragraph 25    (38) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 26    manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to   SB0133- 92 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 2    from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall 3    maintain all necessary books and records to substantiate 4    the use and consumption of all such tangible personal 5    property outside of the State of Illinois.6        (39) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal 7    property used in the construction or maintenance of a 8    community water supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of 9    the Environmental Protection Act, that is operated by a 10    not-for-profit corporation that holds a valid water supply 11    permit issued under Title IV of the Environmental 12    Protection Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 13    provisions of Section 2-70. 14        (40) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 15    December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, 16    components, and furnishings incorporated into or upon an 17    aircraft as part of the modification, refurbishment, 18    completion, replacement, repair, or maintenance of the 19    aircraft. This exemption includes consumable supplies used 20    in the modification, refurbishment, completion, 21    replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft. However, 22    until January 1, 2024, this exemption excludes any 23    materials, parts, equipment, components, and consumable 24    supplies used in the modification, replacement, repair, 25    and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants, 26    whether such engines or power plants are installed or   SB0133- 93 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable supplies" 2    include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 3    sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 4    latex gloves, and protective films. 5        Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 6    December 31, 2023, this exemption applies only to the sale 7    of qualifying tangible personal property to persons who 8    modify, refurbish, complete, replace, or maintain an 9    aircraft and who (i) hold an Air Agency Certificate and 10    are empowered to operate an approved repair station by the 11    Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a Class IV 12    Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance with 13    Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The 14    exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 15    commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 16    service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or 17    Part 129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 18    1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies 19    only to the sale of qualifying tangible personal property 20    to: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, complete, repair, 21    replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) hold an Air 22    Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 23    approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 24    Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) 25    conduct operations in accordance with Part 145 of the 26    Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) persons who engage   SB0133- 94 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    in the modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance 2    of aircraft engines or power plants without regard to 3    whether or not those persons meet the qualifications of 4    item (A).5        The changes made to this paragraph (40) by Public Act 6    98-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent 7    of the General Assembly that the exemption under this 8    paragraph (40) applies continuously from January 1, 2010 9    through December 31, 2024; however, no claim for credit or 10    refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of the 11    disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 12    and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of 13    Public Act 101-629).14        (41) Tangible personal property sold to a 15    public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 16    11-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 17    constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, 18    but only if the legal title to the municipal convention 19    hall is transferred to the municipality without any 20    further consideration by or on behalf of the municipality 21    at the time of the completion of the municipal convention 22    hall or upon the retirement or redemption of any bonds or 23    other debt instruments issued by the public-facilities 24    corporation in connection with the development of the 25    municipal convention hall. This exemption includes 26    existing public-facilities corporations as provided in   SB0133- 95 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois Municipal Code. This 2    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 3        (42) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 4    31, 2026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 5        (43) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental 6    Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser 7    must certify that the item is purchased to be rented 8    subject to a rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the 9    Rental-Purchase Agreement Act, and provide proof of 10    registration under the Rental Purchase Agreement 11    Occupation and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from 12    the provisions of Section 2-70.13        (44) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 14    construction or operation of a data center that has been 15    granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 16    Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 17    personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 18    tenant of the data center or by a contractor or 19    subcontractor of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data 20    centers that would have qualified for a certificate of 21    exemption prior to January 1, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 22    been in effect, may apply for and obtain an exemption for 23    subsequent purchases of computer equipment or enabling 24    software purchased or leased to upgrade, supplement, or 25    replace computer equipment or enabling software purchased 26    or leased in the original investment that would have   SB0133- 96 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    qualified. 2        The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 3    shall grant a certificate of exemption under this item 4    (44) to qualified data centers as defined by Section 5    605-1025 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 6    Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 7    Illinois. 8        For the purposes of this item (44): 9            "Data center" means a building or a series of 10        buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house 11        working servers in one physical location or multiple 12        sites within the State of Illinois. 13            "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 14        electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 15        chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 16        equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 17        generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 18        devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; 19        cabinets; telecommunications cabling infrastructure; 20        raised floor systems; peripheral components or 21        systems; software; mechanical, electrical, or plumbing 22        systems; battery systems; cooling systems and towers; 23        temperature control systems; other cabling; and other 24        data center infrastructure equipment and systems 25        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 26        property, including fixtures; and component parts of   SB0133- 97 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1        any of the foregoing, including installation, 2        maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and replacement of 3        qualified tangible personal property to generate, 4        transform, transmit, distribute, or manage electricity 5        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 6        property; and all other tangible personal property 7        that is essential to the operations of a computer data 8        center. The term "qualified tangible personal 9        property" also includes building materials physically 10        incorporated into the qualifying data center. To 11        document the exemption allowed under this Section, the 12        retailer must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the 13        certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of 14        Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 15        This item (44) is exempt from the provisions of 16    Section 2-70. 17        (45) Beginning January 1, 2020 and through December 18    31, 2020, sales of tangible personal property made by a 19    marketplace seller over a marketplace for which tax is due 20    under this Act but for which use tax has been collected and 21    remitted to the Department by a marketplace facilitator 22    under Section 2d of the Use Tax Act are exempt from tax 23    under this Act. A marketplace seller claiming this 24    exemption shall maintain books and records demonstrating 25    that the use tax on such sales has been collected and 26    remitted by a marketplace facilitator. Marketplace sellers   SB0133- 98 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    that have properly remitted tax under this Act on such 2    sales may file a claim for credit as provided in Section 6 3    of this Act. No claim is allowed, however, for such taxes 4    for which a credit or refund has been issued to the 5    marketplace facilitator under the Use Tax Act, or for 6    which the marketplace facilitator has filed a claim for 7    credit or refund under the Use Tax Act. 8        (46) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 9    collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. 10    This item (46) is exempt from the provisions of Section 11    2-70. As used in this item (46): 12        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 13    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 14    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 15    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 16    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 17    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 18    time of sale. 19        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 20    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 21    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 22    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 23    milk until it is ready for consumption. 24        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 25    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 26    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters;   SB0133- 99 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 2    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 3    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 4    milk storage bags. 5        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 6    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 7    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 8    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 9    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 10    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 11    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 12    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 13    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 14    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 15    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 16    or distributor. 17        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 18    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 19    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 20    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 21    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 22    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 23    manufacturer or distributor. 24        (47) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf 25    of the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform 26    Unclaimed Property Act. This item (47) is exempt from the   SB0133- 100 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    provisions of Section 2-70. 2        (48) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 3    property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 4    forces of the United States who presents valid military 5    identification and purchases the property using a form of 6    payment where the federal government is the payor. The 7    member of the armed forces must complete, at the point of 8    sale, a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue 9    documenting that the transaction is eligible for the 10    exemption under this paragraph. Retailers must keep the 11    form as documentation of the exemption in their records 12    for a period of not less than 6 years. "Armed forces of the 13    United States" means the United States Army, Navy, Air 14    Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard. This 15    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 16        (49) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals 17    provided to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment 18    is made by an intermediary, such as a Medicare 19    Administrative Contractor, a Managed Care Organization, or 20    a Medicare Advantage Organization, pursuant to a 21    government contract. This paragraph (49) is exempt from 22    the provisions of Section 2-70. 23        (50) (49) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further 24    defined in Section 2-10, food for human consumption that 25    is to be consumed off the premises where it is sold (other 26    than alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused   SB0133- 101 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    with adult use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that 2    has been prepared for immediate consumption). This item 3    (50) (49) is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 4        (51) (49) Gross receipts from the lease of the 5    following tangible personal property:6            (1) computer software transferred subject to a 7        license that meets the following requirements:8                (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement 9            signed by the licensor and the customer;10                    (i) an electronic agreement in which the 11                customer accepts the license by means of an 12                electronic signature that is verifiable and 13                can be authenticated and is attached to or 14                made part of the license will comply with this 15                requirement;16                    (ii) a license agreement in which the 17                customer electronically accepts the terms by 18                clicking "I agree" does not comply with this 19                requirement;20                (B) it restricts the customer's duplication 21            and use of the software;22                (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 23            sublicensing, or transferring the software to a 24            third party (except to a related party) without 25            the permission and continued control of the 26            licensor;  SB0133- 102 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1                (D) the licensor has a policy of providing 2            another copy at minimal or no charge if the 3            customer loses or damages the software, or of 4            permitting the licensee to make and keep an 5            archival copy, and such policy is either stated in 6            the license agreement, supported by the licensor's 7            books and records, or supported by a notarized 8            statement made under penalties of perjury by the 9            licensor; and10                (E) the customer must destroy or return all 11            copies of the software to the licensor at the end 12            of the license period; this provision is deemed to 13            be met, in the case of a perpetual license, 14            without being set forth in the license agreement; 15            and16            (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 17        receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local 18        government if the ordinance imposing that tax was 19        adopted prior to January 1, 2023. 20        (52) A motor vehicle of the first division, as defined 21    in Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is 22    registered in the State to an Illinois resident who 23    acquired the vehicle while the Illinois resident was 24    stationed outside of this State as an active duty member 25    of the military. This item (52) is exempt from the 26    provisions of Section 2-70.   SB0133- 103 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1        As used in this item (52): 2        "Active duty member of the military" means a service 3    member who undertakes any full-time military training or 4    full-time military duty, no matter how described under 5    federal or State law, for which a service member is 6    ordered to report by the President, by the Governor of a 7    state, commonwealth, or territory of the United States, by 8    an act of Congress, or by any other appropriate military 9    authority. 10        "Illinois resident" means an individual who meets the 11    definition of "resident" under subparagraph (A) of 12    paragraph (20) of subsection (a) of Section 1501 of the 13    Illinois Income Tax Act. 14        "Service member" means a person who is a member of any 15    component of the United States Armed Forces or the 16    National Guard of any state, the District of Columbia, a 17    commonwealth, or a territory of the United States. 18(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-634, eff. 8-27-21; 19102-700, Article 70, Section 70-20, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, 20Article 75, Section 75-20, eff. 4-19-22; 102-813, eff. 215-13-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, Section 225-20, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-20, eff. 236-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 24eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 25103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 268-9-24; revised 11-26-24.)   SB0133- 104 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    Section 25. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 2changing Section 3-1001 as follows: 3    (625 ILCS 5/3-1001)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-1001)4    Sec. 3-1001. A tax is hereby imposed on the privilege of 5using, in this State, any motor vehicle as defined in Section 61-146 of this Code acquired by gift, transfer, or purchase, 7and having a year model designation preceding the year of 8application for title by 5 or fewer years prior to October 1, 91985 and 10 or fewer years on and after October 1, 1985 and 10prior to January 1, 1988. On and after January 1, 1988, the tax 11shall apply to all motor vehicles without regard to model 12year. Except that the tax shall not apply: 13        (i) if the use of the motor vehicle is otherwise taxed 14    under the Use Tax Act;15        (ii) if the motor vehicle is bought and used by a 16    governmental agency or a society, association, foundation 17    or institution organized and operated exclusively for 18    charitable, religious or educational purposes;19        (iii) if the use of the motor vehicle is not subject to 20    the Use Tax Act by reason of subsection (a), (b), (c), (d), 21    (e) or (f) of Section 3-55 of that Act dealing with the 22    prevention of actual or likely multistate taxation;23        (iv) to implements of husbandry;24        (v) when a junking certificate is issued pursuant to   SB0133- 105 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    Section 3-117(a) of this Code;2        (vi) when a vehicle is subject to the replacement 3    vehicle tax imposed by Section 3-2001 of this Act;4        (vii) when the transfer is a gift to a beneficiary in 5    the administration of an estate and the beneficiary is a 6    surviving spouse; or .7        (viii) if the use of the motor vehicle is not subject 8    to the Use Tax Act by reason of item (47) of Section 3-5 of 9    that Act. 10    Prior to January 1, 1988, the rate of tax shall be 5% of 11the selling price for each purchase of a motor vehicle covered 12by Section 3-1001 of this Code. Except as hereinafter 13provided, beginning January 1, 1988 and until January 1, 2022, 14the rate of tax shall be as follows for transactions in which 15the selling price of the motor vehicle is less than $15,000:16Number of Years Transpired AfterApplicable Tax 17Model Year of Motor Vehicle181 or less$39019229020321521416522511523690247802586526950  SB0133- 106 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b110402over 10253Except as hereinafter provided, beginning January 1, 1988 and 4until January 1, 2022, the rate of tax shall be as follows for 5transactions in which the selling price of the motor vehicle 6is $15,000 or more:7Selling PriceApplicable Tax8$15,000 - $19,999$ 7509$20,000 - $24,999$1,00010$25,000 - $29,999$1,25011$30,000 and over$1,50012    Except as hereinafter provided, beginning on January 1, 132022, the rate of tax shall be as follows for transactions in 14which the selling price of the motor vehicle is less than 15$15,000: 16        (1) if one year or less has transpired after the model 17    year of the vehicle, then the applicable tax is $465; 18        (2) if 2 years have transpired after the model year of 19    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $365; 20        (3) if 3 years have transpired after the model year of 21    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $290; 22        (4) if 4 years have transpired after the model year of 23    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $240; 24        (5) if 5 years have transpired after the model year of 25    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $190; 26        (6) if 6 years have transpired after the model year of   SB0133- 107 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $165; 2        (7) if 7 years have transpired after the model year of 3    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $155; 4        (8) if 8 years have transpired after the model year of 5    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $140; 6        (9) if 9 years have transpired after the model year of 7    the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $125; 8        (10) if 10 years have transpired after the model year 9    of the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax is $115; and 10        (11) if more than 10 years have transpired after the 11    model year of the motor vehicle, then the applicable tax 12    is $100. 13    Except as hereinafter provided, beginning on January 1, 142022, the rate of tax shall be as follows for transactions in 15which the selling price of the motor vehicle is $15,000 or 16more: 17        (1) if the selling price is $15,000 or more, but less 18    than $20,000, then the applicable tax shall be $850; 19        (2) if the selling price is $20,000 or more, but less 20    than $25,000, then the applicable tax shall be $1,100; 21        (3) if the selling price is $25,000 or more, but less 22    than $30,000, then the applicable tax shall be $1,350; 23        (4) if the selling price is $30,000 or more, but less 24    than $50,000, then the applicable tax shall be $1,600; 25        (5) if the selling price is $50,000 or more, but less 26    than $100,000, then the applicable tax shall be $2,600;   SB0133- 108 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1        (6) if the selling price is $100,000 or more, but less 2    than $1,000,000, then the applicable tax shall be $5,100; 3    and 4        (7) if the selling price is $1,000,000 or more, then 5    the applicable tax shall be $10,100. 6For the following transactions, the tax rate shall be $15 for 7each motor vehicle acquired in such transaction:8        (i) when the transferee or purchaser is the spouse, 9    mother, father, brother, sister or child of the 10    transferor;11        (ii) when the transfer is a gift to a beneficiary in 12    the administration of an estate, including, but not 13    limited to, the administration of an inter vivos trust 14    that became irrevocable upon the death of a grantor, and 15    the beneficiary is not a surviving spouse;16        (iii) when a motor vehicle which has once been 17    subjected to the Illinois retailers' occupation tax or use 18    tax is transferred in connection with the organization, 19    reorganization, dissolution or partial liquidation of an 20    incorporated or unincorporated business wherein the 21    beneficial ownership is not changed.22    A claim that the transaction is taxable under subparagraph 23(i) shall be supported by such proof of family relationship as 24provided by rules of the Department.25    For a transaction in which a motorcycle, motor driven 26cycle or moped is acquired the tax rate shall be $25.  SB0133- 109 -LRB104 03841 HLH 13865 b1    On and after October 1, 1985 and until January 1, 2022, 21/12 of $5,000,000 of the moneys received by the Department of 3Revenue pursuant to this Section shall be paid each month into 4the Build Illinois Fund; on and after January 1, 2022, 1/12 of 5$40,000,000 of the moneys received by the Department of 6Revenue pursuant to this Section shall be paid each month into 7the Build Illinois Fund; and the remainder shall be paid into 8the General Revenue Fund.9    The tax imposed by this Section shall be abated and no 10longer imposed when the amount deposited to secure the bonds 11issued pursuant to the Build Illinois Bond Act is sufficient 12to provide for the payment of the principal of, and interest 13and premium, if any, on the bonds, as certified to the State 14Comptroller and the Director of Revenue by the Director of the 15Governor's Office of Management and Budget.16(Source: P.A. 102-353, eff. 1-1-22; 102-762, eff. 5-13-22.)